Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.340

Effect of discharge of jury.

In all cases where a jury are discharged or prevented from giving a verdict, by reason of accident or other cause, during the progress of the trial or after the cause is submitted to them, the action shall thereafter be for trial anew.

[ 1891 c 60 s 2; Code 1881 s 234; 1877 p 49 s 238; 1869 p 58 s 238; RRS s 354.]